Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 14
SUNSET REVIEW - ARTICLE REPEAL

44-10-1401. Sunset review - repeal of article.

This article 10 is repealed, effective September 1, 2028.

Prior to the repeal of this article 10, the department of regulatory agencies shall conduct a sunset review as described in section 24-34-104 (5).

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2935, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 44-11-1001 and 44-12-1001 as they existed prior to 2020.